Vermont, session 2025-2026, H712.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 32 V.S.A. § 8701 is amended to read:
§ 8701. UNIFORM CAPACITY TAX
(a) As used in this section, the terms “energy storage facility,” “kW,”
“kWh,” “plant,” “plant capacity,” and “renewable energy” shall be as defined
in 30 V.S.A. §§ 201(4) and 8002; provided, however, that any tax or
VT LEG #385662 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.712
2026 Page 2 of 10
exemption under this chapter shall only apply to the fixtures and personal
property of a plant and not to the underlying land.
(b)(1) There is assessed on any renewable energy plant in Vermont
commissioned to generate solar power an annual tax of $4.00 $16.00 per kW
of plant capacity.
(2) There is assessed on any stationary grid-connected energy storage
facility in Vermont that has a plant energy rating of 600 kWh or larger and that
is not connected to a renewable energy plant an annual tax of $0.50 $2.00 per
kWh of plant energy rating.
(3) The tax imposed under this section shall be paid to the Department
of Taxes not later than April 15 of each year and accompanied by a return with
such information as the Department of Taxes may require. The Department of
Taxes shall deposit half of the taxes collected under this section into the
Education Fund and half of the taxes collected under this section into the Farm
Security Special Fund. The Department of Taxes may adopt procedures and
rules necessary to implement the tax in this section.
(c) A renewable energy plant that generates electricity from solar power
shall be exempt from taxation under this section if it has a plant capacity of
less than 50kW. An energy storage facility shall be exempt from taxation
under this section if it has a plant energy rating of less than 600 kWh.
VT LEG #385662 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.712
2026 Page 3 of 10
(d) The existence of a renewable energy plant or energy storage facility
subject to tax under subsection (b) of this section shall not:
(1) alter the exempt status of any underlying property under section
3802 or subdivision 5401(10)(F) of this title; or
(2) alter the taxation of the underlying property under chapters 121–135
of this title.
Sec. 2. 16 V.S.A. § 4025 is amended to read:
§ 4025. EDUCATION FUND
(a) The Education Fund is established to comprise the following:
* * *
(9) half of the uniform capacity tax revenue deposited pursuant to 32
V.S.A. § 8701(b)(3);
* * *
Sec. 3. 6 V.S.A. chapter 207 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 207. PROMOTION AND, MARKETING, AND SUPPORT OF
VERMONT FARMS, FOODS, AND PRODUCTS
* * *
Subchapter 5. Farm Security Special Fund
§ 4641. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
VT LEG #385662 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.712
2026 Page 4 of 10
(1) “Eligible weather condition” means any of the following weather
conditions that are found to be closely correlated with agricultural income
losses:
(A) high winds;
(B) excessive moisture, intense precipitation, or flooding;
(C) extreme heat;
(D) abnormal freeze conditions;
(E) widespread fire event;
(F) hail;
(G) drought; or
(H) any other severe weather or growing conditions impacting
agricultural income, as determined by the Review Board.
(2) “Farm” means a parcel or parcels of land owned, leased, or managed
by a person and devoted primarily to farming and that is subject to regulation
under the Required Agricultural Practices.
(3) “Farm Security Special Fund Review Board” or “Review Board”
means the Board established under section 4634 of this title.
(4) “Farming” has the same meaning as in section 2.16 of the Required
Agricultural Practices.
VT LEG #385662 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.712
2026 Page 5 of 10
§ 4642. FARM SECURITY SPECIAL FUND
(a) There is established the Farm Security Special Fund to be administered
by the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets and that shall be managed
in accordance with 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5. The Fund shall consist
of:
(1) funds transferred by the General Assembly;
(2) funds from public and private sources that the Secretary accepts for
the Fund;
(3) funds from federal government aid for State support of farmers
suffering income loss due to weather conditions; and
(4) half of the uniform capacity tax revenue deposited pursuant to 32
V.S.A. § 8701(b)(3).
(b) The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets shall ensure language
accessibility of the Fund through procurement and provision of interpretation
and translation services.
(c) All balances in the Fund at the end of any fiscal year shall be carried
forward and remain part of the Fund.
§ 4643. FARM SECURITY SPECIAL FUND; GRANTS
(a) The Secretary, after consultation with the Review Board, shall award
grants from the Farm Security Special Fund to farms that have incurred
financial losses or expenses due to an eligible weather condition.
VT LEG #385662 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.712
2026 Page 6 of 10
(1) Grants from the fund shall be in an amount that reimburses a farm
for up to 50 percent of uninsured or otherwise uncovered losses due to eligible
weather conditions, up to a maximum award of $150,000.00 total per year per
qualified applicant farm.
(2) The Secretary shall establish criteria for the amount of an award
based on the annual net income of the farm in relation to the median net
income of all farms in Vermont.
(3) The Secretary may verify the occurrence of an eligible weather
condition claimed under this section through a site visit or through use of
available data from the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration,
from other federal or State certified weather data sources, or from other public
or private weather or satellite data or models.
(4) Losses reimbursable by a grant under this section include:
(A) wages or compensation;
(B) replacement of lost income from destroyed crops or impacted
livestock;
(C) debt payments or other ongoing expenses;
(D) costs of replanting;
(E) livestock feed replacement costs;
(F) infrastructure or equipment repair and replacement;
(G) repair of farm roads and roads necessary to access farms; or
VT LEG #385662 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.712
2026 Page 7 of 10
(H) other losses as determined by the Secretary after consultation
with the Review Board.
(b) The Secretary shall develop a streamlined application for awards under
this section that shall include:
(1) a brief description of the damage that occurred;
(2) attestation of an eligible weather condition or event;
(3) an estimate of losses; and
(4) a year-end report of farm income and expenses from Schedule F of
U.S. Internal Revenue Form 1040.
(c) An application for an award under this section may be made at any
time, and the Fund may only close the application process upon award of all
appropriated funds for the relevant fiscal year.
(d) Applications for an award under this section shall be processed in the
order received, but an application shall not be ready for evaluation until the
Secretary determines that the application is administratively complete and
includes all documentation required by the Secretary.
(e) All administratively complete applications shall be evaluated by the
Review Board. Within 15 days following receipt of an administratively
complete application, the Review Board by majority vote shall recommend to
the Secretary whether to issue a grant to the applicant. If the Review Board
VT LEG #385662 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.712
2026 Page 8 of 10
recommends an award under this section, the Secretary shall issue the award
within 15 days following the date of the Review Board’s recommendation.
§ 4644. FARM SECURITY SPECIAL FUND REVIEW BOARD
(a) Creation. There is created the Farm Security Special Fund Review
Board, which for administrative purposes shall be attached to the Agency of
Agriculture, Food and Markets.
(b) Organization of Board. The Board shall be composed of:
(1) the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets or designee, who
shall serve as chair;
(2) the State Chief Recovery Officer or designee;
(3) representatives of three agricultural organizations who can
demonstrate expertise in dealing with all sizes and types of farms in Vermont,
whether through granting funds, offering technical assistance, or advocacy and
have a proven track record of working with farmers, appointed by the
Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets; and
(4) two farmers who have received relief funding, appointed by the
Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets.
(c) Member terms. The members designated in subdivision (b)(3) of this
section shall be appointed to initial terms of two years. Thereafter, each
appointed member shall serve a term of three years or until the member’s
earlier resignation or removal. The members designated in subdivision (b)(4)
VT LEG #385662 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.712
2026 Page 9 of 10
of this section shall be appointed to initial terms of one year. Thereafter, each
appointed member shall serve a term of three years or until the member’s
earlier resignation or removal. A vacancy shall be filled by the appointing
authority for the remainder of the unexpired term. An appointed member shall
not serve more than three consecutive three-year terms.
(d) Powers.
(1) The Review Board shall review applications for assistance under this
section, assess the accuracy and validity of the applications, and recommend to
the Secretary applicants who should receive assistance under this section.
(2) The Board annually shall report to the House Committee on
Agriculture, Food Resiliency, and Forestry and the Senate Committee on
Agriculture the total documented Vermont farm financial losses from eligible
weather conditions averaged over the previous three calendar years.
(3) In order to ensure that the Fund is meeting the needs of Vermont’s
agricultural community, the Review Board annually shall review the
application process, eligibility criteria, distribution, and accessibility of the
Fund. The Review Board annually shall recommend to the House Committee
on Agriculture, Food Resiliency, and Forestry and the Senate Committee on
Agriculture ways to improve the effectiveness of the Fund.
VT LEG #385662 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.712
2026 Page 10 of 10
(e) Officers; committees. The Board may elect officers, establish one or
more committees or subcommittees, and adopt such procedural rules as it shall
determine necessary and appropriate to perform its work.
(f) Quorum; meetings; voting. A majority of the sitting members shall
constitute a quorum, and action taken by the Board may be authorized by a
majority of the members present and voting at any regular or special meeting at
which a quorum is present. The Board may meet as an advisory body under 1
V.S.A. chapter 5, subchapter 2.
(g) Compensation. Private sector members shall be entitled to per diem
compensation authorized under 32 V.S.A. § 1010(b) for each day spent in the
performance of their duties, and each member shall be reimbursed from the
Fund for the member’s actual and necessary expenses incurred in carrying out
the member’s duties.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385662 v.3